Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 4
SENTENCES

28-3.1-401. Cruel and unusual punishments prohibited.

Cruel and unusual punishment may not be adjudged by any court-martial or inflicted upon any person subject to this code.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1180, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-402. Maximum limits.

The punishment which a court-martial may direct for an offense shall not exceed limits prescribed by this code.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1180, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-402.5. Classification of offenses.

A conviction by general court-martial of any military offense for which an accused received a sentence greater than one year of confinement or a conviction by a general court-martial of any offense that, at the time the offense was committed, carries a maximum term of confinement of three years or greater as set forth under 10 U.S.C. sec. 877 to 10 U.S.C. sec. 934, as amended, or pursuant to an executive order, is a felony offense. Except for convictions by a summary court-martial, all other military offenses are misdemeanors. Any conviction by a special court-martial is a misdemeanor. Any conviction by a summary court-martial is not a criminal conviction.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 747, § 15, effective April 2.

28-3.1-403. Effective date of sentences.

Whenever a sentence of a court-martial as lawfully adjudged and approved includes a forfeiture of pay or allowances, in addition to confinement not suspended, the forfeiture may apply to pay and allowances becoming due before or after the date the sentence is approved by the convening authority.

Any period of confinement included in a sentence of a court-martial begins to run from the date the sentence is adjudged by the court-martial, but periods during which the sentence to confinement is suspended shall be excluded in computing the service of the terms of confinement.

On application by an accused who is under sentence to confinement that has not been ordered executed, the convening authority or, if the accused is no longer under his or her jurisdiction, the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned, may in his or her sole discretion defer service of the sentence to confinement. The deferment shall terminate when the sentence is ordered executed. The deferment may be rescinded at any time by the officer who granted it or, if the accused is no longer under his or her jurisdiction, by the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned.

All other sentences of court-martial are effective on the date ordered executed. In no case may a sentence be executed until final action is taken on review.

In the militia or state military forces not in federal service, no sentence of dismissal or dishonorable discharge may be executed until it is approved by the governor.

Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, unless waived by the accused, an officer exercising summary court-martial jurisdiction shall defer service of a sentence to confinement pursuant to section 28-3.1-205 (4)(a), pending the conclusion of any appeal following review and approval pursuant to section 28-3.1-420.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1180, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 611, § 85, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

(6) added, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 747, § 16, effective April 2.

28-3.1-404. Execution of confinement.

A sentence of confinement adjudged by a military court may be carried into execution by confinement in any place of confinement under the control of any of the forces of the state military forces or in any jail, penitentiary, or prison designated for that purpose. Persons so confined in a jail, penitentiary, or prison are subject to the same discipline and treatment as persons confined or committed to the jail, penitentiary, or prison by the courts of the state.

The omission of the words "hard labor" from any sentence or punishment of a court-martial adjudging confinement does not deprive the authority executing that sentence or punishment of the power to require hard labor as a part of the punishment.

The keepers, sheriffs, officers, and wardens of city or county jails and of all other jails, penitentiaries, or prisons designated by the convening authority shall receive persons ordered into confinement before trial or persons committed to confinement by a military court and shall confine them according to law.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1180, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-405. Commitment under sentence of confinement.

When a sentence of confinement is imposed to be served other than in a guardhouse, the convening authority shall issue a writ in the following or similar form:

:u000 STATE OF ________________________ :u1720 )

:u1720 ) ss.

:u000 COUNTY OF ______________________ :u1720 )

To the Sheriff of

County,

, State of Colorado.
WHEREAS,

of

in the

County of

, a member of the Colorado National Guard, was on the

day of

, 20

, tried by court-martial and found guilty of

in violation of the Colorado Military Code and was sentenced to serve

days imprisonment; and
WHEREAS, as such sentence was approved and ordered executed by the convening authority, on the

day of

, 20

;
THEREFORE, you were commanded to take the body of the said

and commit him or her to the keeper of the jail, who is hereby commanded to receive the body of the said

and keep him or her safely for the term of

days, after which he or she shall be released.
Fail not, but do as herein commanded and make a return within sixty (60) days from this date.
Dated at

, in the

County of

this

day of

, 20

.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1181, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 612, § 86, effective May 24.

28-3.1-406. Collection of fines.

All fines imposed as a sentence of a court-martial shall be paid at the time of approval of the sentence by the convening authority.

The commitment to the county jail for nonpayment of fines shall be in the following or similar form:

:u000 STATE OF ________________________ :u1720 )

:u1720 ) ss.

:u000 COUNTY OF ______________________ :u1720 )

To the Sheriff of

County

, State of Colorado.
WHEREAS,

of

in the

County of

, a member of the Colorado National Guard, was on the

day of

, 20

, tried by court-martial and found guilty of

in violation of the Colorado Military Code and was sentenced to pay a fine of

Dollars; and
WHEREAS, such fine has not been paid;
NOW, THEREFORE, by authority of the State of Colorado, you are hereby commanded to take the body of the said

and commit it to the keeper of the jail in the County of

, who is hereby commanded to receive the body of the said

and keep him or her safely until he or she pays the sum above mentioned, or shall have served one (1) day for each dollar of said fine, after which time he or she shall be released.
Fail not, but make service and return within sixty (60) days from this date.
Dated at

, in the

County of

this

day of

, 20

.
___________________

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1181, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 612, § 87, effective May 24.

28-3.1-407. Initial action on the record.

After a trial by court-martial, the record shall be forwarded to the convening authority, as reviewing authority, and action thereon may be taken by the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time being, a successor in command, or the governor. The reviewer may approve the sentence or such part, amount, or commuted form of the sentence as he or she sees fit and may suspend or defer the execution of the sentence.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1182, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 613, § 88, effective May 24.

28-3.1-408. Reconsideration and revision.

If a specification before a court-martial has been dismissed on motion and the ruling does not amount to a finding of not guilty, the convening authority may return the record to the court for reconsideration of the ruling and any further appropriate action.

Where there is an apparent error or omission in the record, or where the record shows improper or inconsistent action by a court-martial with respect to a finding or sentence which can be rectified without material prejudice to the substantial rights of the accused, the convening authority may return the record to the court for appropriate action.

In no case, however, may the record be returned:

For reconsideration of a finding of not guilty or a ruling which amounts to a finding of not guilty; or

For reconsideration of a finding of not guilty of any charge, unless the record shows a finding of guilty under a specification laid under that charge, which sufficiently alleges a violation of the code; or

For increasing the severity of the sentence, unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1182, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-409. Rehearings.

If the convening authority disapproves the findings and sentence of a court-martial, he or she may, except where there is lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support the findings, order a rehearing. In such a case, he or she shall state the reasons for disapproval. If he or she disapproves the findings and sentence and does not order a rehearing, he or she shall dismiss the charges.

Each rehearing shall take place before a court-martial whose composition shall not include any member or military judge of the court-martial which first heard the case. Upon a rehearing, the accused may not be tried for any offense of which he or she was found not guilty by the first court-martial, and no sentence in excess of or more severe than the original sentence may be imposed unless the sentence is based upon a finding of guilty of an offense considered upon the merits in the original proceedings or unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1182, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 613, § 89, effective May 24.

28-3.1-410. Approval by the convening authority.

In acting on the findings and sentence of a court-martial, the convening authority may approve only those findings and the sentence or part or amount of the sentence which he or she finds correct in law and fact. Unless he or she indicates otherwise, approval of the sentence is approval of the findings and sentence.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1182, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 613, § 90, effective May 24.

28-3.1-411. Review of records - disposition.

If the convening authority is the governor, he or she shall refer the record of courts-martial to the state judge advocate general who shall submit his or her written opinion to the governor. If the final action of the court has resulted in acquittal of all charges and specifications, the opinion shall be limited to questions of jurisdiction. After consideration of the opinion, the governor's action on review of any record is final.

Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the convening authority shall refer the record of a general court-martial to the staff judge advocate designated by the state judge advocate general who shall submit his or her written opinion to the convening authority. If the final action of the court has resulted in an acquittal of all charges and specifications, the opinion shall be limited to questions of jurisdiction. When the convening authority has taken final action, he or she shall forward the entire record, including his or her action thereon and the opinion of the staff judge advocate, to the state judge advocate general for review.

In a case reviewable by the state judge advocate general under this section, the staff judge advocate may act only with respect to the findings and sentence as approved by the convening authority. He or she may affirm only the findings of guilty and the sentence or part or amount of the sentence which he or she finds correct in law and fact and determined on the basis of the entire record. In considering the record, he or she may weigh the evidence, judge the credibility of witnesses, and determine controverted questions of fact, recognizing that the trial court saw and heard the witnesses. If the staff judge advocate sets aside the findings and sentence, he or she may, except where the setting aside is based on lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support the findings, order a rehearing. If he or she sets aside the findings and sentence and does not order a rehearing, he or she shall order that the charges be dismissed.

The state judge advocate general shall instruct the convening authority to act in accordance with his or her decision on the review. If he or she has ordered a rehearing, but the convening authority finds a rehearing impracticable, he or she may dismiss the charges.

Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the convening authority of any summary or special court-martial, after taking final action on review, shall forward the entire record, including his or her action thereon, to the staff judge advocate designated by the state judge advocate general. With respect to such record, the staff judge advocate shall have the same duties and powers as provided for the state judge advocate general in paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (2) of this section.

The state judge advocate general may order one or more boards of review, each composed of not less than three commissioned officers of the state military forces, or retired members of the military forces, or members of the United States Air Forces or United States Army reserve, each of whom must be a member of the bar of this state. Each board of review shall review the record of any trial by special court-martial referred to it by the state judge advocate general. Boards of review shall have the same authority on review as the state judge advocate general has under subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1183, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 614, § 91, effective May 24.

28-3.1-412. Review counsel.

Upon the final review of a sentence of any court-martial, the accused has the right to be represented by counsel before the reviewing authority, before the staff judge advocate, and before the state judge advocate general.

Upon the request of an accused, the state judge advocate general shall appoint a lawyer who is a member of the state military forces and who has the qualifications prescribed in section 28-3.1-211 if available, to represent the accused before the reviewing authority, before the staff judge advocate, and before the state judge advocate general in the review of cases specified in subsection (1) of this section.

The accused may be represented by civilian counsel, provided at his or her expense, before the reviewing authority, before the staff judge advocate, and before the state judge advocate general.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1184, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 615, § 92, effective May 24.

28-3.1-413. Review by governor.

Notwithstanding review procedures provided in this code, in any case where no right to review by the governor exists, the accused may, within thirty days after final action is taken by any reviewing authority, petition the governor to review such final action. The governor may take action as he or she deems appropriate. Failure of the governor to act within thirty days shall constitute a denial.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1184, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 615, § 93, effective May 24.

28-3.1-414. Error of law - lesser included offense.

A finding or sentence of a court-martial shall not be held incorrect on the ground of an error of law, unless the error materially prejudices the substantial rights of the accused.

Any reviewing authority with the power to affirm a finding of guilty may affirm so much of the findings as includes a lesser included offense.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1184, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-415. Vacation of suspension of sentence.

Before the vacation of the suspension of any court-martial sentence, the officer having court-martial jurisdiction over a probationer shall hold a hearing on the alleged violation of probation. The probationer shall be represented at the hearing by counsel, if he or she so desires.

The record of the hearing and the recommendation of the officer having court-martial jurisdiction shall be sent for action to the state judge advocate in cases involving a general court-martial sentence. If the state judge advocate vacates the suspension, any unexecuted part of the sentence shall be executed.

The suspension of any other sentence may be vacated by any authority competent to convene, for the command in which the accused is serving or assigned, a court of the kind that imposed the sentence.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1184, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 615, § 94, effective May 24.

28-3.1-416. Petition for a new trial.

At any time within two years after approval by the convening authority of a court-martial sentence, the accused may petition the governor for a new trial on grounds of newly discovered evidence or fraud on the court-martial.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1184, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-417. Remission and suspension.

A convening authority may remit or suspend any part or amount of the unexecuted part of any sentence, including all uncollected forfeitures.

The governor may, for good cause, substitute an administrative form of discharge for a discharge or dismissal executed in accordance with the sentence of a court-martial.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1184, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-418. Restoration.

Under regulations prescribed by the governor, all rights, privileges, and property affected by an executed part of a court-martial sentence which has been set aside or disapproved, except an executed dismissal or discharge, may be restored, unless a new trial or rehearing is ordered and the executed part is included in a sentence imposed upon a new trial or rehearing.

If a previously executed sentence of dishonorable discharge or other punitive discharge is not imposed on a new trial, the governor shall substitute a form of discharge authorized for administrative issuance unless the accused is to serve out the remainder of his or her enlistment.

If a previously executed sentence of dismissal is not imposed on a new trial, the governor shall substitute a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue, and a commissioned officer dismissed by that sentence may be reappointed only by the governor to the commissioned grade and rank as that former officer would have attained had he or she not been dismissed. The reappointment of such a former officer may be made if a position vacancy is available under applicable tables of organization. All time between the dismissal and reappointment shall be considered as service for all state purposes.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1185, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 615, § 95, effective May 24.

28-3.1-419. Finality of proceedings, findings, and sentences.

The proceedings, findings, and sentences of courts-martial as reviewed and approved as required by this code and all dismissals and discharges carried into execution under sentences by courts-martial following review and approval as required by this code are final. Orders publishing the proceedings of courts-martial and all action taken pursuant to those proceedings are binding upon all departments, courts, agencies, and officers of the state, subject only to action upon a petition for a new trial as provided by section 28-3.1-416 or action taken on appeal as provided by section 28-3.1-420.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1185, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1176, § 2, effective April 16.

28-3.1-420. Appeal following review and approval.

The accused, within thirty-five days after the date the final reviewing authority takes action, may take an appeal to the supreme court of the state of Colorado pursuant to the Colorado appellate rules.

When the accused petitions the governor pursuant to section 28-3.1-413 to review the final action of the reviewing authority, the time for filing notice of appeal is extended until thirty-five days after the governor announces his or her action or the petition is denied due to the governor's failure to act. No action or failure to act by the governor shall form the basis for appeal, nor shall the supreme court order review by the governor.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1177, § 3, effective April 16.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 615, § 96, effective May 24.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1126), ch. 58, p.193, § 6, effective July 1.

28-3.1-421. Appeal by the state.

In a trial by court-martial or in a trial by military judge only pursuant to section 28-3.1-316 (4) in which a punitive discharge may be adjudged, the state may not appeal a finding of not guilty with respect to the charge or specification. In a trial by court-martial in which a punitive discharge may be adjudged, the state may appeal the following:

An order or ruling of the military judge that terminates the proceedings with respect to a charge or specification;

An order or ruling that excludes evidence that is substantial proof of a fact material in the proceeding;

An order or ruling that directs the disclosure of classified information;

An order or ruling that imposes sanctions for nondisclosure of classified information;

A refusal of the military judge to issue a protective order sought by the state to prevent the disclosure of classified information; or

A refusal by the military judge to enforce an order described in subsection (1)(e) of this section that has previously been issued by the appropriate authority.

An appeal of an order or ruling may not be taken unless the trial counsel provides the military judge with written notice of appeal from the order or ruling within seventy-two hours of the order or ruling. Such notice must include a certification by the trial counsel that the appeal is not taken for the purpose of delay and, if the order or ruling appealed is one that excludes evidence, that the evidence excluded is substantial proof of a fact material in the proceeding.

An appeal under this article 3.1 must be diligently prosecuted as provided by law.

An appeal under this article 3.1 must be forwarded to the court prescribed in this code. In ruling on an appeal under this article 3.1, that court may act only with respect to matters of law.

Any period of delay resulting from an appeal under this article 3.1 must be excluded in deciding any issue regarding denial of a speedy trial unless an appropriate authority determines that the appeal was filed solely for the purpose of delay with the knowledge that it was totally frivolous and without merit.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 747, § 17, effective April 2.